Colorado, session 2026A, HB1376.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-111, amend
(2)(d)(II)(C) as follows:
26-1-111. Activities of the state department under the
supervision of the executive director - cash fund - report - rules -
statewide adoption resource registry.
(2) The state department, under the supervision of the executive
director, shall:
(d) (II) (C) For fiscal year 2003-04 and each fiscal year, thereafter,
after the amounts described in subsections (2)(d)(II)(A) and (2)(d)(II)(B) of
this section are set aside, the total amount of money remaining shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same MONEY to the
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

excess federal Title IV-E reimbursements cash fund, which fund is hereby
IS created IN THE STATE TREASURY and referred to in this subsection
(2)(d)(II)(C) as the "fund". The money in the fund is subject to annual
appropriation by the general assembly to the state department. for allocation
to counties to help defray the costs of performing administrative functions
related to obtaining federal reimbursement money available under the Title
IV-E program. In addition, the general assembly may annually appropriate
money in the fund to the department of early childhood for allocation to the
counties for the provision of child care assistance, as described in section
26.5-4-105, and to the state department for allocation to the counties for the
provision of assistance, as defined in section 26-2-703 (2); social services,
as defined in section 26-2-103 (11); and child welfare services, as defined
in section 26-5-101 (3). For fiscal year 2004-05, and in subsequent years if
so specified by the general assembly in the annual appropriations act, the
counties shall expend the money allocated by the department of early
childhood for the provision of child care assistance and by the state
department for the provision of assistance, social services, and child welfare
services pursuant to this subsection (2)(d)(II)(C) in a manner that will be
applied toward the state's maintenance of historic effort as specified in
section 409 (a)(7) of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended. FOR
STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026- 27, AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
MONEY IN THE FUND MUST BE USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 473
(a)(8) OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL SECURITY ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 673 (a)(8).
PERMISSIBLE USES OF THE MONEY IN THE FUND INCLUDE POST-PERMANENCY
SERVICES TO SUPPORT AND SUSTAIN POSITIVE, PERMANENT OUTCOMES FOR
A CHILD OR YOUTH WHO MIGHT OTHERWISE ENTER OR REENTER FOSTER
CARE. Any money in the fund not expended for the purposes specified in
this subsection (2)(d)(II)(C) may be invested by the state treasurer as
provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income
derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund to the fund.
Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end
of a fiscal year remains in the fund and is not credited or transferred or
DOES NOT revert to the general fund or another fund.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1376

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1376